Utah statutes.
20A-5-703.   Neglect or refusal to deliver ballots or returns.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person or officer who has undertaken to deliver
official ballots or election returns to any voting precinct or to any poll
worker or election officer to neglect, refuse, or fail to do so.
(2)  Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not less than six months, and fined
not less than $250.
